Massachusetts, session 194th, H2617.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 32 of Chapter 22C is hereby amended by inserting after the words “or
intimidation” the following:-
“, or an attack on a police officer which results in serious injury or death”
of 1